Tennessee, session 114, SB2202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-303(g), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" and substituting "forty (40) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2202
012238
- 1 -